Massachusetts, session 194th, H2235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27A of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding after the words “implementing this program “ in
line 12 the following:
(b) (1) Sharps disposal programs must include the following:
(i) all pharmacies that sell or distribute hypodermic needles and lancets
(ii) all health clinics
(iii) all hospitals
(iv) all nursing home facilities
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 27A of chapter 94C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out in line 16 the words “establishing sharps collection centers in medical facilities and
pharmacies;”.
SECTION 3. Section 27A of chapter 94C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out in line 25 the words “Medical facilities, pharmacies and participating municipal
facilities” and inserting in place thereof the following words: “participating facilities”.
of 2